Louisiana, session 2026, SB342.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 15 of Title 18 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 18:1955 through 1962, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 15. VOTER PROTECTION ACT
§1955. Short Title. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Voter
Protection Act"
§1955.1 Findings and Purpose. The legislature finds that:
A. The right to vote is fundamental to democracy, and every eligible
Louisiana voter should have fair and equal access to the ballot.
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-594 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 342
B. Laws should protect voters from intimidation, misinformation,
administrative barriers, and unnecessary burdens in registration and voting.
C. Enhancing transparency, voter access, and election integrity
strengthens public confidence in Louisiana's electoral process.
§1956. Definitions
For purposes of this Chapter, the following terms shall have the
meanings unless the context indicated otherwise:
(1) "Voter assistance provider" means any individual or entity providing
nonpartisan assistance to voters for registration, absentee ballot applications,
or voting procedures.
(2) "Voting rights violations" means actions that unlawfully discourage
or prohibit a person from registering or voting, including intimidation,
misinformation, or discriminatory practices.
§1957. Protection against voter intimidation and misinformation
A. Prohibition on intimidation and misinformation.
(1) No person shall knowingly or intentionally intimidate, deceive,
misinform, or coerce any voter, prospective voter, or voter assistance provider
regarding any aspect of registration, voting, or qualifications to vote.
(a) Prohibited conduct includes but is not limited to threatening
language, dissemination of false information regarding voter eligibility, voting
requirements, polling times, or locations.
(b) This Subsection reinforces existing protections against intimidation
under R.S. 18:1461.4 and complements laws governing conduct at polling
places.
B. Enforcement and penalties.
(1) Violations of this Section shall be a misdemeanor, punishable by a
fine of not less than one thousand dollars and not more than five thousand
dollars, imprisonment for up to six months, or both.
(2) Violations involving organized or systematic voter suppression shall
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-594 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 342
be a felony with enhanced penalties.
C. No person shall knowingly or intentionally intimidate, threaten,
deceive, coerce, or misinform any voter, prospective voter, or voter assistance
provider regarding any of the following items:
(1) Eligibility to vote.
(2) Requirements for registration.
(3) Polling place location.
(4) Voting times or dates.
(5) Procedures for casting a ballot.
D. The conduct prohibited by this Section including, but not be limited
to dissemination of materially false information intended to discourage or
prevent lawful voting.
E.(1) Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than one thousand
dollars nor more than five thousand dollars, imprisoned for not more than six
months, or both.
(2) If the violation involves coordinated, organized, or systematic efforts
to suppress voter participation, the offender shall be guilty of a felony and, upon
conviction, shall be imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not more than
five years, fined not more than ten thousand dollars, or both.
§1958. Voter registration and access enhancements; modernization
A. Standardized statewide materials. The secretary of state shall develop
and provide standardized, accessible voter registration forms, instructions, and
outreach materials in multiple languages reflective of the state's demographic
needs.
B. Extended early registration period. The deadline for voter registration
shall be extended by seven days before the close of registration under R.S.
18:135, to improve eligible voters' ability to register prior to elections.
C. Online and mobile-friendly services. The secretary of state shall
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-594 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 342
expand digital voter registration capabilities, with secure online systems and
mobile-friendly applications.
§1959. Polling place protections
A.(1) No interference zone. In addition to existing campaign-free zones,
no individual shall engage in electioneering, distribution of false voting
information, or acts of persuasion targeting voters within six hundred feet of
any polling place during early voting or on election day.
(2) Law enforcement officers and election officials may enforce the
provisions of this Section to ensure orderly and lawful voting.
B. Each polling place shall prominently display signage outlining voter
rights under state and federal law.
C. All parish registrars shall provide reasonable assistance to voters with
disabilities and ensure compliance with federal accessibility laws.
§1960. Transparency of voter roll maintenance
A. Annual notification. Registrars shall provide written notification to
any voter whose registration is considered inactive, with clear instructions on
how to confirm or update registration status and preserve voting eligibility. This
notice shall include all of the following items:
(1) The reason for the designation.
(2) Instructions on how to restore or maintain active status.
B. Public reporting. The secretary of state shall publish an annual report
on voter roll maintenance activities, including counts of inactive voters,
removals, and confirmations.
§1961. Voter assistance provider protections
A. No person providing voter assistance in good faith shall be prosecuted
or penalized for providing nonpartisan help to a voter, including registration,
absentee ballot assistance, or information regarding voting procedures, unless
the provider knowingly provides fraudulent information.
§1962. Judicial Review
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-594 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 342
Any person aggrieved by an act prohibited under this Act may seek
injunctive relief in a court of competent jurisdiction.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on August 1, 2026.